Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
CHAPTER 2 Construction

13-2-1.
Construction of contracts by courts generally; findings of fact by juries.

The construction of a contract is a question of law for the court. Where any matter of fact is involved, the jury should find the fact.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2718; Code 1868, § 2712; Code 1873, § 2754; Code 1882, § 2754; Civil Code 1895, § 3672; Civil Code 1910, § 4265; Code 1933, § 20-701.

13-2-2.
Rules for interpretation of contracts generally.

The following rules, among others, shall be used in arriving at the true interpretation of contracts:

Parol evidence is inadmissible to add to, take from, or vary a written contract. All the attendant and surrounding circumstances may be proved and, if there is an ambiguity, latent or patent, it may be explained; so, if only a part of a contract is reduced to writing (such as a note given in pursuance of a contract) and it is manifest that the writing was not intended to speak the whole contract, then parol evidence is admissible;

Words generally bear their usual and common signification; but technical words, words of art, or words used in a particular trade or business will be construed, generally, to be used in reference to this peculiar meaning. The local usage or understanding of a word may be proved in order to arrive at the meaning intended by the parties;

The custom of any business or trade shall be binding only when it is of such universal practice as to justify the conclusion that it became, by implication, a part of the contract, except in regard to those transactions covered by Title 11;

The construction which will uphold a contract in whole and in every part is to be preferred, and the whole contract should be looked to in arriving at the construction of any part;

If the construction is doubtful, that which goes most strongly against the party executing the instrument or undertaking the obligation is generally to be preferred;

The rules of grammatical construction usually govern, but to effectuate the intention they may be disregarded; sentences and words may be transposed, and conjunctions substituted for each other. In extreme cases of ambiguity, where the instrument as it stands is without meaning, words may be supplied;

When a contract is partly printed and partly written, the latter part is entitled to most consideration;

Estates and grants by implication are not favored; and

Time is not generally of the essence of a contract; but, by express stipulation or reasonable construction, it may become so.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, §§ 1, 2721; Code 1868, §§ 1, 2715; Code 1873, § 1, 2757; Code 1882, §§ 1, 2757; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1, 3675; Civil Code 1910, §§ 1, 4268; Code 1933, § 20-704; Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 188, § 38; Ga. L. 1964, p. 414, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 13/HB 1387.

The 2010 amendment,

effective June 3, 2010, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, added “and” at the end of paragraph (8).

Parties intended to honor arbitration clause in debt agreement. —

Trial court erred by denying a client’s motion to compel arbitration of the claim against a debt settlement corporation for violations of the debt adjusting statutes, O.C.G.A. §18-5-1 et seq., because the arbitration provision in the debt settlement agreement mandated arbitration of all disputes and claims between the parties related to the agreement and the claim that the corporation violated statutes regulating the business of debt adjusting was connected to the debt settlement agreement. Penso Holdings, Inc. v. Cleveland, 324 Ga. App. 259, 749 S.E.2d 821, 2013 Ga. App. LEXIS 829 (2013).

Parties’ intent is paramount consideration and preservation of whole contract preferred. —

While it is well settled that when contract is partly written and partly printed, written portion is entitled to most consideration and if printed portions of contract cannot be reconciled with written portions, latter prevail, still cardinal rule of construction is to ascertain intention of parties, and construction which will uphold contract in whole and in every part is to be preferred, and whole contract should be looked to in arriving at construction of any part. Capital Wall Paper Co. v. Callan Court Co., 38 Ga. App. 428, 144 S.E. 135, 1928 Ga. App. LEXIS 267 (1928).

Written addition to a settlement agreement did not control

where the printed major portion thereof was tailored to list the names of the parties to be released and the specific incident for which the release was to apply. Campos v. Williams, 217 Ga. App. 296, 457 S.E.2d 243, 1995 Ga. App. LEXIS 450 (1995).

Parties to notes may make time of essence by provision for acceleration upon default. —

Although time is not generally of the essence of a contract, it may become so by express stipulation or reasonable construction, and it is competent for parties to series of promissory notes, maturing monthly through several years, to provide that in case of default in payment of any two of them, and continuation of such default for specified period, the entire series shall, at option of holder thereof, become due and collectible. Cone v. Hunter, 38 Ga. App. 45, 142 S.E. 468, 1928 Ga. App. LEXIS 24 (1928).

Partner competent to contract for firm may make time of essence of contract,

and bind firm to abide legal consequence of so doing. Van Winkle & Co. v. Wilkins, 81 Ga. 93, 7 S.E. 644 (1888).

13-2-3.
Ascertainment and enforcement of intention of parties generally.

The cardinal rule of construction is to ascertain the intention of the parties. If that intention is clear and it contravenes no rule of law and sufficient words are used to arrive at the intention, it shall be enforced irrespective of all technical or arbitrary rules of construction.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2719; Code 1868, § 2713; Code 1873, § 2755; Code 1882, § 2755; Civil Code 1895, § 3673; Civil Code 1910, § 4266; Code 1933, § 20-702.

Parties cannot by contract provision prevent construction in accordance with applicable laws. —

Parties to a contract cannot by way of provision prevent interpretation of contract by courts in accordance with law applicable thereto. McKie v. McKie, 213 Ga. 582, 100 S.E.2d 580, 1957 Ga. LEXIS 450 (1957).

Where terms and conditions are left to future negotiations,

the requisite meeting of the minds is absent and no contract is formed. Dumas v. First Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n, 654 F.2d 359, 1981 U.S. App. LEXIS 18184 (5th Cir. 1981).

Section applicable to conveyances of land. —

There can be no good reason why provisions of this statute should not apply to conveyances of land. Woodson v. Veal, 60 Ga. 562, 1878 Ga. LEXIS 539 (1878).

Section applicable to insurance contracts. —

A policy of life insurance is a contract. Cardinal rule for construction of which is to ascertain intention of parties. Bullard v. Life & Cas. Ins. Co., 178 Ga. 673, 173 S.E. 855, 1934 Ga. LEXIS 132 (1934).

Contracts of insurance, like other contracts, are subject to rule of law that intention of parties must be ascertained. American Cas. Co. v. Fisher, 195 Ga. 136, 23 S.E.2d 395, 1942 Ga. LEXIS 708 (1942).

A contract of insurance is construed to carry out intent of parties. Morris v. Mutual Benefit Life Ins. Co., 258 F. Supp. 186, 1966 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6710 (N.D. Ga. 1966).

Insurance policies in Georgia are governed by the ordinary rules of construction. Chicago Title Ins. Co. v. Citizens & S. Nat'l Bank, 821 F. Supp. 1492, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6869 (N.D. Ga. 1993), aff'd, 20 F.3d 1175, 1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 7244 (11th Cir. 1994).

Parties may provide for alternative forms of payment for realty if sufficiently definite for enforcement. —

There is nothing inherently vague or improper in providing for alternative forms of payment in contract to sell realty as long as each alternative is sufficiently definite to be enforced. Rhyne v. Garfield, 236 Ga. 694, 225 S.E.2d 43, 1976 Ga. LEXIS 994 (1976).

Whether contract is one of suretyship or of guaranty, is governed by intention of parties.

Baggs v. Funderburke, 11 Ga. App. 173, 74 S.E. 937, 1912 Ga. App. LEXIS 314 (1912); McKibben v. Fourth Nat'l Bank, 32 Ga. App. 222, 122 S.E. 891, 1924 Ga. App. LEXIS 343 (1924), overruled, Timberlake Grocery Co. v. Cartwright, 146 Ga. App. 746, 247 S.E.2d 567, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 2549 (1978).

Though some of the provisions in a tax sharing agreement entered into by a corporate parent and the corporation’s subsidiary in connection with the parent’s filing of consolidated federal tax returns were ambiguous, the intention of the parties as discerned by a circuit court of appeals in accord with Georgia law was that the parent was to hold, as agent for the subsidiary, any tax refund which was solely attributable to losses incurred by the subsidiary; because that was the case with this tax refund, it was the property of the subsidiary and thus was not includable in the Chapter 11 bankruptcy estate of the parent. FDIC v. Zucker (In re NetBank, Inc.), 729 F.3d 1344, 2013 U.S. App. LEXIS 18774 (11th Cir. 2013), cert. denied, 574 U.S. 990, 135 S. Ct. 476, 190 L. Ed. 2d 357, 2014 U.S. LEXIS 7594 (2014).

Parties intended to name employer as additional insured. —

As a renewal policy was issued while an independent contractor agreement was still in force, and that agreement obliged the insured to name an employer as an additional insured on the insured’s commercial general liability policy, the court concluded as a matter of law that the parties intended that the employer be named as an additional insured on the renewal policy, even though it was not clearly named therein. Grange Mut. Cas. Co. v. Snipes, 298 Ga. App. 405, 680 S.E.2d 438, 2009 Ga. App. LEXIS 626 (2009).

Section limits on rule that will to be construed under law effective at testator’s death. —

A will is to be construed under the law in effect at testator’s death, but this is only one of the rules of construction and is applicable only where no expression on subject was made by testator. Carnegie v. First Nat'l Bank, 218 Ga. 585, 129 S.E.2d 780, 1963 Ga. LEXIS 267 (1963).

13-2-4.
Ascertainment of intention of parties where meaning placed on contract by one party known to other.

The intention of the parties may differ among themselves. In such case, the meaning placed on the contract by one party and known to be thus understood by the other party at the time shall be held as the true meaning.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2720; Code 1868, § 2714; Code 1873, § 2756; Code 1882, § 2756; Civil Code 1895, § 3674; Civil Code 1910, § 4267; Code 1933, § 20-703.

Section inapplicable to assignee misled as to meaning of contract. —

This statute has no application to assignee of contract, although one party sought to be bound by such understanding knew at time of contract’s execution that such assignee would take assignment of contract under belief and expectation that contract had meaning different from that put upon contract by such party. Citizens & S. Bank v. Union Whse. & Compress Co., 157 Ga. 434, 122 S.E. 327, 1924 Ga. LEXIS 68 (1924).

When legal effect produced by words, and effect intended differ, true intention shall prevail.

Especially is this true when one party is mistaken and other party is aware of mistake. White & Hamilton Lumber Co. v. Foster, 157 Ga. 493, 122 S.E. 29, 1924 Ga. LEXIS 188 (1924).

Section applied when one acquiesces by silence to other party’s stated interpretation. —

See Cason v. Duke, 28 Ga. App. 170, 110 S.E. 684, 1922 Ga. App. LEXIS 359 (1922).

Section applied to offer to enter contract. —

See Columbus Bagging & Tie Co. v. Empire Mills Co., 38 Ga. App. 793, 145 S.E. 886, 1928 Ga. App. LEXIS 460 (1928).